Utah statutes.
63M-7-521.5.   Payments to medical providers.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a medical service provider who accepts payment from the office shall agree to accept payments as payment in full on behalf of the victim or claimant.  The medical service provider may not attempt to collect further payment from the victim or the claimant for services for which the office has made payment.

(2)  In the event the office is unable to make full payment in accordance with its rules, the medical service provider may collect from the victim or claimant, but not more than the amount the provider would have received from the office.

(3)  The office may:

(a)  use the fee schedule utilized by the Utah Public Employees Health Plan or any other fee schedule adopted by the board; and

(b)   make rules necessary to implement the fee schedule adopted in accordance with this section.

